Utah statutes.
4-33-5.   Prohibitions.

It is unlawful for any person in this state:

(1)  to offer for sale, sell, or deliver any motor fuel which fails to meet the standards prescribed by the department;

(2)  to advertise or display the price of motor fuel without advertising or displaying the grade of the motor fuel and the type of service when both self service and full service are offered;

(3)  to haul or transport motor fuel for the purpose of sale or delivery in this state without an invoice or bill of lading stating the name and address of the owner or person consigning the fuel for transport, the Utah grade of the motor fuel, and the number of gallons consigned.

